Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.070

Powers and duties of state veterinarian.

The state veterinarian shall exercise all the powers and perform all duties prescribed by law relating to diseases among animals and the quarantine and destruction of diseased animals.

The state veterinarian shall enforce and supervise the administration of all laws relating to meat inspection, the prevention, detection, control and eradication of diseases of animals, and all other matters relative to the diseases of livestock and their effect upon the public health.

[ 1998 c 8 s 20; 1983 c 248 s 7; 1967 c 240 s 7; 1965 c 8 s 43.23.070. Prior: 1943 c 56 s 1; 1921 c 7 s 92; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 10850.]

NOTES:

Animal health: Chapter 16.36 RCW.

Dairies and dairy products: Chapter 15.36 RCW.

Diseased animals: Chapter 16.36 RCW.